Maryland, session 2025, HB1353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
1–101.
(a) Titles 1 through [10] 10A of this article may be cited as the Maryland Uniform
Commercial Code.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1353*

HOUSE BILL 1353
(b) This title may be cited as Maryland Uniform Commercial Code – General
Provisions.
TITLE 10A. CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORDS.
10A–101.
THIS TITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE MARYLAND UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE
– CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORDS.
10A–102.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ACCOUNT DEBTOR” MEANS A PERSON OBLIGATED ON AN
ACCOUNT, A CHATTEL PAPER, OR A GENERAL INTANGIBLE.
(2) “ACCOUNT DEBTOR” DOES NOT INCLUDE A PERSON OBLIGATED
TO PAY A NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT, EVEN IF THE NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENT
EVIDENCES CHATTEL PAPER.
(C) (1) “CHATTEL PAPER” MEANS:
(I) A RIGHT TO PAYMENT OF A MONETARY OBLIGATION
SECURED BY SPECIFIC GOODS, IF THE RIGHT TO PAYMENT AND SECURITY
AGREEMENT ARE EVIDENCED BY A RECORD; OR
(II) A RIGHT TO PAYMENT OF A MONETARY OBLIGATION OWED
BY A LESSEE UNDER A LEASE AGREEMENT WITH RESPECT TO SPECIFIC GOODS AND
A MONETARY OBLIGATION OWED BY THE LESSEE IN CONNECTION WITH THE
TRANSACTION GIVING RISE TO THE LEASE, IF:
1. THE RIGHT TO PAYMENT AND THE LEASE AGREEMENT
ARE EVIDENCED BY A RECORD; AND
2. THE PREDOMINANT PURPOSE OF THE TRANSACTION
GIVING RISE TO THE LEASE WAS TO GIVE THE LESSEE THE RIGHT TO POSSESSION
AND USE OF THE GOODS.
(2) “CHATTEL PAPER” DOES NOT INCLUDE A RIGHT TO A PAYMENT
ARISING OUT OF A CHARTER OR OTHER CONTRACT INVOLVING THE USE OR HIRE OF

HOUSE BILL 1353 3
A VESSEL OR A RIGHT TO PAYMENT ARISING OUT OF THE USE OF A CREDIT OR
CHARGE CARD OR INFORMATION CONTAINED ON OR FOR USE WITH THE CARD.
(D) “CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT” MEANS AN ACCOUNT EVIDENCED BY A
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT PROVIDES THAT THE ACCOUNT
DEBTOR UNDERTAKES TO PAY THE PERSON THAT HAS CONTROL OF THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10A–105 OF THIS
TITLE.
(E) (1) “CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD” MEANS A RECORD
STORED IN AN ELECTRONIC MEDIUM THAT CAN BE SUBJECTED TO CONTROL UNDER
§ 10A–105 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) “CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT, A CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE, A DEPOSIT
ACCOUNT, AN ELECTRONIC COPY OF A RECORD EVIDENCING CHATTEL PAPER, AN
ELECTRONIC DOCUMENT OF TITLE, ELECTRONIC MONEY, INVESTMENT PROPERTY,
OR A TRANSFERABLE RECORD.
(F) “CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE” MEANS A PAYMENT
INTANGIBLE EVIDENCED BY A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT
PROVIDES THAT THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR UNDERTAKES TO PAY THE PERSON THAT
HAS CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 10A–105 OF THIS TITLE.
(G) “DEPOSIT ACCOUNT” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–102 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
(H) “ELECTRONIC MONEY” MEANS MONEY IN AN ELECTRONIC FORM.
(I) “INVESTMENT PROPERTY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 9–102 OF
THIS ARTICLE.
(J) “QUALIFYING PURCHASER” MEANS A PURCHASER OF A CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD OR AN INTEREST IN A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD
THAT OBTAINS CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD FOR VALUE,
IN GOOD FAITH, AND WITHOUT NOTICE OF A CLAIM OF PROPERTY RIGHT IN THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD.
(K) “TRANSFERABLE RECORDS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 21–115 OF
THIS ARTICLE.

HOUSE BILL 1353
(L) “VALUE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–303 OF THIS ARTICLE BUT
WITH RESPECT TO A CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT, CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD, OR CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE, RATHER THAN AN
INSTRUMENT.
10A–103.
(A) IF THERE IS A CONFLICT BETWEEN THIS TITLE AND TITLE 9 OF THIS
ARTICLE, TITLE 9 OF THIS ARTICLE GOVERNS.
(B) A TRANSACTION SUBJECT TO THIS TITLE IS ALSO SUBJECT TO ANY
OTHER APPLICABLE STATE LAW.
10A–104.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO THE ACQUISITION OF RIGHTS IN A
CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT OR CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE, INCLUDING
THE RIGHTS AND BENEFITS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C) THROUGH (E), (G),
AND (H) OF THIS SECTION OF A PURCHASER AND QUALIFYING PURCHASER, IN THE
SAME MANNER THIS SECTION APPLIES TO A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD.
(B) TO DETERMINE WHETHER A PURCHASER OF A CONTROLLABLE
ACCOUNT OR A CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE IS A QUALIFYING
PURCHASER, THE PURCHASER OBTAINS CONTROL OF THE ACCOUNT OR PAYMENT
INTANGIBLE IF THE PURCHASER OBTAINS CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT EVIDENCES THE ACCOUNT OR PAYMENT INTANGIBLE.
(C) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SECTION, A DETERMINATION ABOUT
WHETHER A PERSON ACQUIRES A RIGHT IN A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD
AND THE TYPE OF RIGHT THE PERSON ACQUIRES CAN BE MADE USING APPLICABLE
STATE OR FEDERAL LAW.
(D) (1) A PURCHASER OF A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD
ACQUIRES ALL RIGHTS IN THE RECORD THAT THE TRANSFEROR HAD THE
AUTHORITY TO TRANSFER.
(2) NOTWITHSTANDING PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PURCHASER OF A LIMITED INTEREST IN A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD
SHALL ACQUIRE RIGHTS ONLY TO THE EXTENT OF THE INTEREST PURCHASED.
(E) A QUALIFYING PURCHASER ACQUIRES RIGHTS IN THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD FREE OF A CLAIM OF A PROPERTY RIGHT IN THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD.

HOUSE BILL 1353 5
(F) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN A LAW NOT INCLUDED UNDER
THIS ARTICLE AND SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (E) OF THIS SECTION WITH RESPECT TO A
CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT AND A CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE, A
QUALIFYING PURCHASER TAKES A RIGHT TO PAYMENT, RIGHT TO PERFORMANCE,
OR OTHER INTEREST IN PROPERTY EVIDENCED BY THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD SUBJECT TO A CLAIM OF A PROPERTY RIGHT IN THE RIGHT TO
PAYMENT, RIGHT TO PERFORMANCE, OR OTHER INTEREST IN PROPERTY.
(G) AN ACTION MAY NOT BE ASSERTED AGAINST A QUALIFYING PURCHASER
BASED ON BOTH A PURCHASE BY THE QUALIFYING PURCHASER OF A
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD AND A CLAIM OF PROPERTY RIGHT IN
ANOTHER CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD, WHETHER THE ACTION IS
FRAMED IN CONVERSION, REPLEVIN, CONSTRUCTIVE TRUST, EQUITABLE LIEN, OR
OTHER THEORY.
(H) THE FILING OF A FINANCING STATEMENT UNDER TITLE 9 OF THIS
ARTICLE IS NOT NOTICE OF A CLAIM OF A PROPERTY RIGHT IN A CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD.
10A–105.
(A) A PERSON HAS CONTROL OF A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IF
THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD, A RECORD ATTACHED TO OR
LOGICALLY ASSOCIATED WITH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD, OR A
SYSTEM IN WHICH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IS RECORDED:
(1) GIVES THE PERSON:
(I) THE AUTHORITY TO AVAIL THE PERSON OF SUBSTANTIALLY
ALL THE BENEFIT FROM THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, EXCLUSIVE
POWER TO:
1. PREVENT OTHERS FROM AVAILING THEMSELVES OF
SUBSTANTIALLY ALL OF THE BENEFIT FROM THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD; AND
2. TRANSFER CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD TO ANOTHER PERSON OR CAUSE ANOTHER PERSON TO
OBTAIN CONTROL OF ANOTHER CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD AS A RESULT
OF THE TRANSFER OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD; AND

HOUSE BILL 1353
(2) ENABLES THE PERSON READILY TO IDENTIFY THE PERSON IN ANY
WAY, INCLUDING BY NAME, IDENTIFYING NUMBER, CRYPTOGRAPHIC KEY, OFFICE,
OR ACCOUNT NUMBER AS HAVING THE POWERS SPECIFIED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, POWER IS EXCLUSIVE
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(II) OF THIS SECTION, EVEN IF:
(1) THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD, A RECORD
ATTACHED TO OR LOGICALLY ASSOCIATED WITH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD, OR A SYSTEM IN WHICH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IS
RECORDED LIMITS THE USE OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD OR HAS
A PROTOCOL PROGRAMMED TO CAUSE A CHANGE, INCLUDING A TRANSFER OR LOSS
OF CONTROL OR A MODIFICATION OF BENEFITS AFFORDED BY THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD; OR
(2) THE POWER IS SHARED WITH ANOTHER PERSON.
(C) THE POWER OF A PERSON IS NOT SHARED WITH ANOTHER PERSON
UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION AND THE PERSON’S POWER IS NOT
EXCLUSIVE IF:
(1) THE PERSON CAN EXERCISE THE POWER ONLY IF THE POWER IS
ALSO EXERCISED BY THE OTHER PERSON; AND
(2) THE OTHER PERSON:
(I) CAN EXERCISE THE POWER WITHOUT EXERCISE OF THE
POWER BY THE PERSON; OR
(II) IS THE TRANSFEROR TO THE PERSON OF AN INTEREST IN
THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD OR A CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT OR
CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE EVIDENCED BY THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD.
(D) IF A PERSON HAS THE POWER SPECIFIED IN SUBSECTION (A)(1)(II) OF
THIS SECTION, THE POWERS ARE PRESUMED TO BE EXCLUSIVE.
(E) A PERSON HAS CONTROL OF A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IF
ANOTHER PERSON, OTHER THAN THE TRANSFEROR TO THE PERSON OF AN
INTEREST IN THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD OR A CONTROLLABLE

HOUSE BILL 1353 7
ACCOUNT OR CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE EVIDENCED BY THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD:
(1) HAS CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD
AND ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE PERSON HAS CONTROL ON BEHALF OF THE PERSON;
OR
(2) OBTAINS CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD AFTER HAVING ACKNOWLEDGED THAT THE PERSON WILL OBTAIN CONTROL
OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD ON BEHALF OF THE PERSON.
(F) A PERSON THAT HAS CONTROL UNDER THIS SECTION IS NOT REQUIRED
TO ACKNOWLEDGE THAT THE PERSON HAS CONTROL ON BEHALF OF ANOTHER
PERSON.
(G) IF A PERSON ACKNOWLEDGES THAT THE PERSON HAS, OR WILL OBTAIN,
CONTROL ON BEHALF OF ANOTHER PERSON, UNLESS THE PERSON OTHERWISE
AGREES, OR A LAW OTHER THAN IN THIS TITLE OR TITLE 9 OF THIS ARTICLE
OTHERWISE PROVIDES, THE PERSON DOES NOT OWE A DUTY TO THE OTHER PERSON
AND IS NOT REQUIRED TO CONFIRM THE ACKNOWLEDGMENT TO ANY OTHER
PERSON.
10A–106.
(A) AN ACCOUNT DEBTOR ON A CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT OR
CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE MAY DISCHARGE THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR’S
OBLIGATION BY PAYING:
(1) THE PERSON HAVING CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT EVIDENCES THE CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT OR
CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE; OR
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, A
PERSON THAT FORMERLY HAD CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD.
(B) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR
MAY NOT DISCHARGE THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR’S OBLIGATION BY PAYING THE PERSON
THAT FORMERLY HAD CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IF
THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR RECEIVES A NOTIFICATION THAT:
(1) IS SIGNED BY A PERSON THAT FORMERLY HAD CONTROL OR THE
PERSON TO WHOM CONTROL WAS TRANSFERRED;

HOUSE BILL 1353
(2) REASONABLY IDENTIFIES THE CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT OR
CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE;
(3) NOTIFIES THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR THAT CONTROL OF THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT EVIDENCES THE CONTROLLABLE
ACCOUNT OR CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE WAS TRANSFERRED;
(4) IDENTIFIES THE TRANSFEREE IN ANY REASONABLE WAY,
INCLUDING BY NAME, IDENTIFYING NUMBER, CRYPTOGRAPHIC KEY, OFFICE, OR
ACCOUNT NUMBER; AND
(5) PROVIDES A COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE METHOD BY WHICH
THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR IS TO PAY THE TRANSFEREE.
(C) AFTER RECEIPT OF A NOTIFICATION THAT COMPLIES WITH SUBSECTION
(B) OF THIS SECTION, THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR:
(1) MAY DISCHARGE THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR’S OBLIGATION BY
PAYING ACCORDING TO INSTRUCTIONS IN THE NOTIFICATION; AND
(2) MAY NOT DISCHARGE THE OBLIGATION BY PAYING A PERSON
THAT FORMERLY HAD CONTROL.
(D) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THE SECTION, NOTIFICATION IS
INEFFECTIVE UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(1) UNLESS, BEFORE NOTIFICATION IS SENT, THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR
AND THE PERSON THAT AT THAT TIME HAD CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT EVIDENCES THE CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT OR
CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE AGREE IN A SIGNED RECORD TO A
COMMERCIALLY REASONABLE METHOD BY WHICH A PERSON MAY FURNISH
REASONABLE PROOF THAT CONTROL HAS BEEN TRANSFERRED;
(2) TO THE EXTENT AN AGREEMENT BETWEEN THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR
AND SELLER OF A PAYMENT INTANGIBLE LIMITS THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR’S DUTY TO
PAY A PERSON OTHER THAN THE SELLER AND THE LIMITATION IS EFFECTIVE UNDER
LAW OTHER THAN UNDER THIS TITLE; OR
(3) AT THE OPTION OF THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR, IF THE NOTIFICATION
NOTIFIES THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR TO:
(I) DIVIDE A PAYMENT;

HOUSE BILL 1353 9
(II) MAKE LESS THAN THE FULL AMOUNT OF AN INSTALLMENT
OR OTHER PERIODIC PAYMENT; OR
(III) PAY ANY PART OF A PAYMENT BY MORE THAN ONE METHOD
OR TO MORE THAN ONE PERSON.
(E) (1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, IF REQUESTED BY
THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR, THE PERSON GIVING THE NOTIFICATION UNDER
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION SHALL FURNISH REASONABLE PROOF, USING THE
METHOD IN THE AGREEMENT REFERRED TO UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, THAT CONTROL OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD HAS BEEN
TRANSFERRED.
(2) UNLESS THE PERSON COMPLIES WITH THE REQUEST, THE
ACCOUNT DEBTOR MAY DISCHARGE THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR’S OBLIGATION BY
PAYING A PERSON THAT FORMERLY HAD CONTROL EVEN IF THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR
HAD RECEIVED A NOTIFICATION UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION.
(F) A PERSON FURNISHES PROOF UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION
THAT CONTROL HAS BEEN TRANSFERRED IF THE PERSON DEMONSTRATES, USING
THE METHOD IN THE AGREEMENT REFERRED TO UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1) OF THIS
SECTION, THAT THE TRANSFEREE HAS THE POWER TO:
(1) AVAIL THE TRANSFEREE OF SUBSTANTIALLY ALL THE BENEFITS
FROM THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD;
(2) PREVENT OTHERS FROM AVAILING THEMSELVES OF
SUBSTANTIALLY ALL THE BENEFITS FROM THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD; AND
(3) TRANSFER THE POWER SPECIFIED UNDER ITEMS (1) AND (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO ANOTHER PERSON.
(G) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (H) OF THIS SECTION, AN ACCOUNT DEBTOR
MAY NOT WAIVE OR MODIFY THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR’S RIGHTS:
(1) UNDER SUBSECTION (D)(1) OR (E) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) IF ELECTED BY THE ACCOUNT DEBTOR, UNDER SUBSECTION (D)
OF THIS SECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1353
(H) THIS SECTION IS SUBJECT TO ANY OTHER LAW THAT ESTABLISHES A
DIFFERENT RULE FOR AN ACCOUNT DEBTOR WHO IS AN INDIVIDUAL AND WHO
INCURRED THE OBLIGATION PRIMARILY FOR PERSONAL, FAMILY, OR HOUSEHOLD
PURPOSES.
10A–107.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL
LAW OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S JURISDICTION GOVERNS A
MATTER COVERED BY THIS TITLE.
(B) FOR A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT EVIDENCES A
CONTROLLABLE ACCOUNT OR CONTROLLABLE PAYMENT INTANGIBLE, THE LOCAL
LAW OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S JURISDICTION GOVERNS A
MATTER COVERED BY § 10A–106 OF THIS TITLE UNLESS AN EFFECTIVE AGREEMENT
DETERMINES THAT THE LOCAL LAW OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION GOVERNS.
(C) THE FOLLOWING RULES DETERMINE A CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD’S JURISDICTION UNDER THIS SECTION:
(1) IF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD, OR A RECORD
ATTACHED TO OR LOGICALLY ASSOCIATED WITH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD THAT IS READILY AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW, EXPRESSLY PROVIDES THAT A
PARTICULAR JURISDICTION IS THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S
JURISDICTION, THEN FOR PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE, THAT JURISDICTION IS THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S JURISDICTION;
(2) IF ITEM (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY AND THE
RULES OF THE SYSTEM IN WHICH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD IS
RECORDED ARE READILY AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW AND EXPRESSLY PROVIDE THAT
A PARTICULAR JURISDICTION IS THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S
JURISDICTION, THEN FOR PURPOSES OF THIS TITLE, THAT JURISDICTION IS THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S JURISDICTION;
(3) IF ITEMS (1) AND (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY AND THE
CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD, OR A RECORD ATTACHED TO OR LOGICALLY
ASSOCIATED WITH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD THAT IS READILY
AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW, EXPRESSLY PROVIDES THAT THE CONTROLLABLE
ELECTRONIC RECORD IS GOVERNED BY THE LAW OF A PARTICULAR JURISDICTION,
THEN THAT JURISDICTION IS THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S
JURISDICTION; AND

HOUSE BILL 1353 11
(4) IF ITEMS (1) THROUGH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION DO NOT APPLY
AND THE RULES OF THE SYSTEM IN WHICH THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC
RECORD IS RECORDED ARE READILY AVAILABLE FOR REVIEW AND EXPRESSLY
PROVIDE THAT THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD OR SYSTEM IS
GOVERNED BY THE LAW OF A PARTICULAR JURISDICTION, THEN THAT
JURISDICTION IS THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S JURISDICTION.
(D) TO THE EXTENT SUBSECTIONS (A) AND (B) OF THIS SECTION PROVIDE
THAT THE LOCAL LAW OF THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S
JURISDICTION GOVERNS A MATTER COVERED BY THIS TITLE, THAT LAW GOVERNS
EVEN IF THE MATTER OR A TRANSACTION TO WHICH THE MATTER RELATES DOES
NOT BEAR ANY RELATION TO THE CONTROLLABLE ELECTRONIC RECORD’S
JURISDICTION.
(E) THE RIGHTS ACQUIRED UNDER § 10A–104 OF THIS TITLE BY A
PURCHASER OR QUALIFYING PURCHASER ARE GOVERNED BY THE LAW APPLICABLE
UNDER THIS SECTION AT THE TIME OF PURCHASE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.